Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB60.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1434YC (6) 91 je/jh H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 256.183, subsection 1, unnumbered 1 paragraph 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 âAccredited private institutionâ means an institution of 3 higher learning located in Iowa which is operated privately 4 and not controlled or administered by any state agency or 5 any subdivision of the state and which meets the criteria in 6 paragraphs âaâ and âbâ and all of the criteria in paragraphs âdâ 7 through âjâ âkâ , except that institutions defined in paragraph 8 âcâ of this subsection are exempt from the requirements of 9 paragraphs âaâ and âbâ : 10 Sec. 2. Section 256.183, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 11 by adding the following new paragraph: 12 NEW PARAGRAPH . k. Adopt a policy for compliance with 13 chapter 261K. 14 Sec. 3. Section 256.183, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended 15 to read as follows: 16 3. âEligible institutionâ means an institution of higher 17 learning located in Iowa which is operated privately and 18 not controlled or administered by any state agency or any 19 subdivision of the state, which is not exempt from taxation 20 under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, and which 21 meets all of the criteria in subsection 1 , paragraphs âdâ 22 through âjâ âkâ , and is a school of barbering and cosmetology 23 arts and sciences licensed under chapter 157 and is accredited 24 by a national accrediting agency recognized by the United 25 States department of education. For the fiscal year beginning 26 July 1, 2017, such a school of barbering and cosmetology arts 27 and sciences shall provide a matching aggregate amount of 28 institutional financial aid equal to at least seventy-five 29 percent of the amount received by the institutionâs students 30 for Iowa tuition grant assistance under section 256.191 . For 31 the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2018, the school of barbering 32 and cosmetology arts and sciences shall provide a matching 33 aggregate amount of institutional financial aid equal to at 34 least eighty-five percent of the amount received in that fiscal 35 -1- LSB 1434YC (6) 91 je/jh 1/ 4 H.F. _____ year. Commencing with the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2019, 1 and each succeeding fiscal year, the matching aggregate amount 2 of institutional financial aid shall be at least equal to the 3 match provided by eligible institutions under section 261.9, 4 subsection 3 , paragraph âaâ , Code 2023. 5 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 261K.1 Definitions. 6 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise 7 requires: 8 1. âDepartmentâ means the department of education. 9 2. âDiversity, equity, and inclusionâ means the same as 10 defined in section 261J.1, as enacted by 2024 Iowa Acts, ch. 11 1152, Â§31. 12 3. âDiversity, equity, and inclusion officeâ means the same 13 as defined in section 261J.1, as enacted by 2024 Iowa Acts, ch. 14 1152, Â§31. 15 4. âPrivate institution of higher educationâ means an 16 accredited private institution as defined in section 256.183 or 17 an eligible institution as defined in section 256.183. 18 Sec. 5. NEW SECTION . 261K.2 Diversity, equity, and 19 inclusion office prohibited. 20 1. A private institution of higher education shall not, 21 except as otherwise provided by federal or state law or 22 accreditation standards, establish, sustain, support, or staff 23 a diversity, equity, and inclusion office. 24 2. Subsection 1 shall not be construed to cover or affect a 25 public institution of higher educationâs funding of any of the 26 following: 27 a. Academic course instruction. 28 b. Research or creative works by the public institution 29 of higher educationâs students, faculty, or other research 30 personnel, and the dissemination of such research or creative 31 works. 32 c. Activities of registered student organizations. 33 d. Arrangements for guest speakers and performers with 34 short-term engagements. 35 -2- LSB 1434YC (6) 91 je/jh 2/ 4 H.F. _____ e. Mental or physical health services provided by licensed 1 professionals. 2 3. Subsection 1 shall not be construed as prohibiting bona 3 fide qualifications based on sex that are reasonably necessary 4 to the normal operation of private higher education. 5 Sec. 6. NEW SECTION . 261K.3 Enforcement. 6 1. Any person may report a private institution of higher 7 educationâs potential violation of section 261K.2 to the 8 attorney general. The attorney general shall provide notice 9 of such report to the department and the institution within 10 fifteen days. No later than thirty days after receiving such 11 notice, the institution shall do one of the following: 12 a. Correct the violation and provide documentation of the 13 correction to the attorney general and the department. 14 b. Provide documentation to the attorney general and the 15 department demonstrating that the action of the institution 16 upon which the report was based was not a violation of section 17 261K.2. 18 2. If, upon the conclusion of the thirty-day period 19 provided in subsection 1, the institution has not complied 20 with subsection 1, paragraph âaâ , or provided documentation 21 under subsection 1, paragraph âbâ , that demonstrates to 22 the satisfaction of the attorney general that a violation 23 of section 261K.2 did not occur, the institution shall be 24 ineligible to participate in the tuition grant program under 25 chapter 256, subchapter VII, part 4, subpart B, as of the next 26 academic year beginning thereafter. When either action is 27 carried out by the institution, eligibility shall be restored 28 as of the next academic year beginning after such action is 29 carried out. The attorney general shall notify the college 30 student aid commission to this effect. 31